Idaho, session 2025, H0162.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1604, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 16, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1604, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1604. SHORT TITLE. This section through section 33-1604D, Idaho
Code, shall be known and may be cited as the "School-Sponsored Bible Reading
Act."
SECTION 3. That Chapter 16, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1604A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1604A. STATEMENT OF INTENT. The legislature finds and declares
that:
(1) The Bible is the most important book in the world, molds public
morality, impacts history, and contains unequaled literary value.
(2) The King James version of the Bible is the best-selling book in
world history and has had an immeasurable impact on Anglo-American culture
and the English language. The King James version, its revision in the new
King James version, and the revised standard version are widely studied and
utilized by many diverse religions and denominations and therefore are con-
sidered nonsectarian.
(3) Early Americans understood the importance of daily school Bible
reading as essential to maintaining an educated and virtuous society and
therefore implemented the practice in the American colonies and American
states.


(4) The framers of both the United States constitution and the consti-
tution of the state of Idaho avowed that republican self-government in our
constitutional system could not function with a biblically illiterate popu-
lace.
(5) Section 24, article III of the constitution of the state of Idaho
affirms the bedrock principle that the "first concern of all good government
is the virtue and sobriety of the people" and further directs the Idaho leg-
islature to enact policies that promote temperance and morality.
(6) The supreme court of the United States recognized the practice of
school Bible reading in Vidal v. Girard's Executors (1844).
(7) Idaho public school children heard the Bible read in their school
classrooms for nearly one hundred (100) years.
(8) The Idaho legislature adopted a statewide policy in 1925 that re-
quired the Bible to be read in public schools without instruction or comment.
(9) The supreme court of the United States ruled for the first time in
Abington School District v. Schempp (1963) that school-sponsored Bible
reading violated the first and fourteenth amendments to the United States
constitution, using purpose and effect analysis that eventually became part
of Lemon test jurisprudence.
(10) The practice of daily school Bible reading in Idaho continued un-
til Adams v. Engelking (1964), when the United States district court for the
district of Idaho relied on the decision of the supreme court of the United
States in the Abington case in declaring section 33-1604, Idaho Code, uncon-
stitutional under the first and fourteenth amendments to the United States
constitution.
(11) In Kennedy v. Bremerton School District (2022), the supreme court
of the United States abandoned the Lemon test, instead holding that the es-
tablishment clause of the first amendment to the United States constitution
"must be interpreted by reference to historical practices and understand-
ings."
(12) Daily Bible reading in schools, without instruction or comment, is
part of the historical practices of early Idaho and other American states
and is consistent with the original meaning and history of the establishment
clause of the United States constitution.
(13) As a result of this shift in establishment clause jurisprudence,
Abington and Adams should no longer be given deference as binding precedent.
(14) Federal and state law has historically provided reasonable accom-
modations to individuals with religious or conscience-based objections to
generally applicable laws.
(15) Therefore, the state of Idaho asserts its interest in requiring the
Bible to be read daily, without comment or interpretation, in every public
school classroom, consistent with the history and tradition of our state and
nation.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 16, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1604B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1604B. SCHOOL-SPONSORED BIBLE READING. Selections from the King
James version, the new King James version, or the revised standard version
of the Bible shall be read each morning of each instructional day in each


occupied classroom in all public school districts. Such reading shall be
without comment or interpretation. Each school district shall organize the
daily selections in such a way that the entire Bible is read sequentially and
completed over ten (10) school years. Any question by any pupil relating to
the Bible reading shall be referred to the pupil's parent or guardian.
SECTION 5. That Chapter 16, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1604C, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1604C. CONSCIENCE PROTECTIONS. A public school shall provide a
reasonable accommodation for daily Bible reading to the following:
(1) Any teacher who is unwilling to read the Bible on religious or con-
science-based grounds, in which case the selections shall be read by another
person each morning of each instructional day in each occupied classroom in
all public school districts pursuant to section 33-1604B, Idaho Code; and
(2) Any student whose parent or guardian provides a written request to
the school to be exempted from daily Bible readings.
SECTION 6. That Chapter 16, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1604D, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1604D. INJUNCTIVE RELIEF. A resident of the public school dis-
trict, a parent of a student enrolled in the public school district, an
employee of the public school district, the state superintendent of public
instruction, or the attorney general shall have a cause of action for injunc-
tive relief against any school district that violates the provisions of sec-
tion 33-1604B or 33-1604C, Idaho Code. The injunction shall be sufficient
to prevent the defendant school district from violating the requirements of
sections 33-1604B and 33-1604C, Idaho Code.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.